morphology/spellChecker/normalizer/normalizer-relaxSpellcheck.foma
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
# TODOs: 
# -switches: allow -m as -n, -pas as -pis
# yachachinasuykikupaq yacha[VRoot][=saber,habitar][--]chi[VDeriv][+Caus][--]na[NS][+Obl][--]suykiku[NPers][+1.Pl.Excl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj]
# -upallarapuyku LLAra
# compile without -sa progressive! too ambiguous
# -rqakun -> rqaku -n / -rqa -ku -n


       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@ICHU"|"@CHANI"|"@RI"|"@PLbol"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@ICHU"|"@CHANI"|"@RI"|"@PLbol"] ];
       
      define CleanSigma [ "" <- ["+1.Obj" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Poss" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Poss+Lim" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Subj" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Subj.Fut" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj" | "+1.Pl.Excl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj.Fut" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Poss" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Poss+Lim" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj.Fut" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj.Imp" | "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj.Pot" | "+1.Poss" | "+1.Sg.Poss" | "+1.Sg.Poss+Lim" | "+1.Sg.Subj" | "+1.Sg.Subj.Fut" | "+1.Sg.Subj.Pot" | "+1.Sg.Subj_2.Pl.Obj" | "+1.Sg.Subj_2.Pl.Obj.Fut" | "+1.Sg.Subj_2.Sg.Obj" | "+1.Sg.Subj_2.Sg.Obj.Fut" | "+2.Obj" | "+2.Pl.Poss" | "+2.Pl.Poss+Lim" | "+2.Pl.Subj" | "+2.Pl.Subj.Imp" | "+2.Pl.Subj.Pot" | "+2.Sg.Poss" | "+2.Sg.Poss+Lim" | "+2.Sg.Subj" | "+2.Sg.Subj.Imp" | "+2.Sg.Subj.Pot" | "+2.Sg.Subj_1.Pl.Excl.Obj" | "+2.Sg.Subj_1.Pl.Obj.Imp" | "+3.Pl.Poss" | "+3.Pl.Poss+Lim" | "+3.Pl.Subj" | "+3.Pl.Subj.Fut" | "+3.Pl.Subj.Hab" | "+3.Pl.Subj.IPst" | "+3.Pl.Subj.Imp" | "+3.Pl.Subj.NPst" | "+3.Pl.Subj.Pot" | "+3.Pl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj" | "+3.Poss" | "+3.Sg.Poss" | "+3.Sg.Poss+Lim" | "+3.Sg.Subj" | "+3.Sg.Subj.Fut" | "+3.Sg.Subj.IPst" | "+3.Sg.Subj.Imp" | "+3.Sg.Subj.NPst" | "+3.Subj_1.Pl.Excl.Obj" | "+3.Subj_1.Pl.Excl.Obj.Fut" | "+3.Subj_1.Pl.Incl.Obj" | "+3.Subj_1.Pl.Incl.Obj.Fut" | "+3.Subj_2.Pl.Obj" | "+3.Subj_2.Sg.Obj" | "+Abl" | "+Abtmp" | "+Acc" | "+Add" | "+Aff" | "+Ag" | "+Aprx" | "+Asmp" | "+Asmp_Emph" | "+Ass" | "+Aug" | "+Autotrs" | "+Ben" | "+Caus" | "+Char" | "+Cis_Trs" | "+Con_Inst" | "+Con_Intr" | "+Cont" | "+DS" | "+Dat_Ill" | "+Def" | "+Des" | "+Desesp" | "+Dim" | "+Dir" | "+DirE" | "+DirE_Emph" | "+Disc" | "+Dist" | "+Distr" | "+Dub" | "+Emph" | "+Fact" | "+Gen" | "+IPst" | "+Iclsv" | "+Inch" | "+IndE" | "+IndE_Emph" | "+Inf" | "+Int" | "+Intr_Neg" | "+Intrup" | "+Intsoc" | "+Kaus" | "+Lim_Aff" | "+Loc" | "+Mom" | "+MPoss" | "+MRep" | "+Multi" | "+NPst" | "+Neg" | "+Obl" | "+Onom" | "+Perdur" | "+Perf" | "+Pl" | "+Posi" | "+Poss" | "+Pot" | "+Priv" | "+Prog" | "+QTop" | "+Rem" | "+Rep" | "+Res" | "+Reub" | "+Rflx_Int" | "+Rgr_Iprs" | "+Rptn" | "+Rzpr" | "+SS" | "+SS_Sim" | "+Sim" | "+Sml" | "+Soc" | "+Stat_Multi" | "+Term" | "+Top" | "+Trs" | "+Vdim" | "PrnPers+1.Pl.Excl" | "PrnPers+1.Pl.Incl" | "PrnPers+1.Sg" | "PrnPers+2.Sg" | "PrnPers+3.Sg" | "PrnPers+Lim+1.Pl.Excl" | "PrnPers+Lim+1.Pl.Incl"]  ]; 
       

       
      
############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"];

      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Ersetze optional u durch o und i durch e, falls in Umgebung von q #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone1 [ u (->) o||  _ (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}) q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}) _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}) _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|{ll}) q, q (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|{ll}){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|') _  ];
      define Allophone2 [ {ll} (->) l || _ q];

      define Allophone [Allophone1 .o. Allophone2 ] ;
      define AllophoneBeforeCleanUp [ m (->) n || \"@MPA" _ p ];

       #---------------------------#
       # alternative orthographies #
       #---------------------------#

       # dialecatal variations
       define Orthography1 [ {ch} (->) {ts}, {Ch} (->) {Ts} ];
       
       # spanish Orthographies
       define Orthography2 [ {q} (->) {cc}, {Q} (->) {Cc}, q (->) {ck}];
       define Orthography3 [ {wi} (->) {hui}, {Wi} (->) {Hui}  ];
       define Orthography4 [ {wa} (->) {hua}, {Wa} (->) {Hua} ];
       define Orthography5 [ {wa} (->) {gua}, {Wa} (->) {Gua}];
       define Orthography6 [ {ch'} (->) {chch}, {ch'} (->) {chh}, s (->) {ss}, {chh} (->) {ch} , {chh} (->) {chch}];
       define Orthography7 [ {q'} (->) {qq} , {q'} (->) {kc} , {qh} (->) {kc} , {q'i} (->) {qque}, {qi} (->) {qque} ];
       define Orthography8 [ {t'} (->) {tt} , {k'} (->) {kc} , {th} (->) {tj}];
       define Orthography9 [ {k'} (->) {kk} ,{kh} (->) {cj} ];
       define Orthography10 [ {p'} (->) {pp} , {ph} (->) {pj}];
       define Orthography11 [ {ay} (->) {ai} , {yku} (->) {yqu}, {yki} (->) {iqui}];
       define Orthography12 [ n (->) m || _ p];
       define Orthography13 [ {w} (->) {u} || Vowel _ ];
       define Orthography14 [ {k} (->) {qu} || _ [i|e] ];
       define Orthography15 [ {k} (->) {c} || _ [a|l|m|n|ñ|o|p|r|s|t|u|y]];
       
       # fricatives in syllable coda
       define Orthography16 [ {h} (->) {j}, {H} (->) {J} ||  [a|i|l|m|n|r|u] _ Vowel ];
       define Orthography17 [ [{k}|{q}] (->) {j} || Vowel_ ];       
       define Orthography18 [ {ph} (->) {f}];     
       
       # alternation h/q at the beginning of a word
       define Orthography19 [ {h} (->) {q} || .#. _ ];  
       
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6 .o. Orthography7 .o. Orthography8 .o. Orthography9 .o. Orthography10 .o. Orthography11 .o. Orthography12 .o. Orthography13 .o. Orthography14 .o. Orthography15 .o. Orthography16 .o. Orthography17 .o. Orthography18 .o. Orthography19 ];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone .o. Orthography;

       # apply after Cleanup
      # define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú , i (->) í];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u];
       define AccentES2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
       define spanLetras [ e (->) i, i (->) e, o (->) u, u (->) o, c (->) k , d (->) t, g (->)j, w  (->) o, b (->) p, v (->) w, z (->) s , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. AccentES2 .o. spanLetras;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

        #define POSSESSIV1 [ {@POSS} -> [{ni}|{ñi}]  || Cons _ ];
        #define POSSESSIV2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowel _ ];
	#define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => Vowel _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];

       define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2;

       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # restrict plural -s to a position before case suffixes, otherwise assume it's the indirect evidential #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define BolPl [  "@PLbol"  =>  _ ?* ["+Iclsv"|"+Intsoc"|"+Distr"|"+Term"|"+Aprx"|"+Acc"|"+Gen"|"+Abl"|"+Dat_Ill"|"+Ben"|"+Loc"|"+Dist"|"+Con_Inst"|"+Soc"|"+Kaus"] ];
       
       define NounRules GENITIV .o. POSSESSIV;
       define NounRulesUpper BolPl;

       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       define shortYKU [  "+y+"  => _  "+Aff" "@YKU" {wa}"+1.Obj" ];
